West Virginia, session 2025, HB2892.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. PEDESTRIANS' RIGHTS AND DUTIES. §17C-10-6. Pedestrians on roadways; soliciting rides; unlawful traffic interference. (a) Where sidewalks are provided it shall be unlawful for any pedestrian to walk along and upon an adjacent roadway.(b) Where sidewalks are not provided any pedestrian walking along and upon a highway shall when practicable walk only on the left side of the roadway or its shoulder facing traffic which may approach from the opposite direction.(c) No person shall stand in a roadway for the purpose of soliciting a ride from the driver of any vehicle.(d) Unless otherwise provided by existing law or permitted by the appropriate governmental authority, no person may impede vehicular traffic with their body and/or by placing any object in such a manner so as to impede vehicular traffic.(e) A person who violates subsection (d) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $100; upon a second conviction within one year thereafter, shall be fined not more than $200; and upon a third or subsequent conviction, shall be fined not more than $500. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home